Utah statutes.
59-23-3.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Brine shrimp eggs" means dormant, early stage brine shrimp embryos
encapsulated as cysts that are harvested from within the state.
(2)  "Tax year" means a one-year period beginning on February 1 and ending on
January 31 of the following year.
